Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3410
First purchaser; deduct fees; maintain records; public inspection; statement.

(1) The first purchaser, at the time of settlement, shall deduct the poultry and egg fees as provided in section 2-3408 and shall maintain records as specified in the rules and regulations promulgated under sections 2-3401 to 2-3416. Such records shall be open for inspection and audit by authorized representatives of the department during normal business hours observed by the purchaser.

(2) The purchaser shall render and have on file with the department a statement of the number of poultry or cases of eggs purchased in Nebraska in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated under sections 2-3401 to 2-3416. At the time the statement is filed, the purchaser shall pay and remit to the department the fees as provided for in section 2-3408.

Laws 1976, LB 514, § 10.
December 31, 2027